Nebraska, session 109, LB599.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB599 LB599
2025 2025
Section 1. The State Board of Education shall adopt a policy that
may be used in approved or accredited public, private, denominational,
and parochial schools and educational service units relating to
cybersecurity. Such policy shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) A cybersecurity framework guide for implementing cybersecurity
controls in a prioritized manner;
(2) The creation of a cybersecurity team that acts to assist schools
and educational service units with cybersecurity needs and addresses
cybersecurity issues from a statewide perspective to prevent and respond
to cybersecurity threats;
(3) A curriculum component that expands and defines digital
citizenship requirements for students, parents, and teachers;
(4) A pipeline for technology careers designed to recruit, retain,
and support students from rural areas in pursuing careers in technology
and encouraging such students to return and contribute to their local
economies; and
(5) A funding mechanism to assist in purchasing necessary
cybersecurity controls and facilitating the acquisition of cybersecurity
projects.
-2-